Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
General Provisions

§ 25-3-1.
Classifications of counties.

For the purposes of this chapter the counties are divided into eight (8) classes, numbered from One to Eight, according to the 1930 total assessed valuation of the real, personal, and public service corporation property of each county, as follows:

Class Number One. — Shall be composed of all counties in which the assessed valuation equals and exceeds Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00).

Class Number Two. — Shall be composed of all counties in which the assessed valuation equals and exceeds Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) and is less than Twenty-five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00).

Class Number Three. — Shall be composed of all counties in which the assessed valuation equals and exceeds Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00) and is less than Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00).

Class Number Four. — Shall be composed of all counties in which the assessed valuation equals and exceeds Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) and is less than Fifteen Million Dollars ($15,000,000.00).

Class Number Five. — Shall be composed of all counties in which the assessed valuation equals and exceeds Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00) and is less than Ten Million Dollars ($10,000.000.00).

Class Number Six. — Shall be composed of all counties in which the assessed valuation equals and exceeds Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00) and is less than Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00).

Class Number Seven. — Shall be composed of all counties in which the assessed valuation equals and exceeds Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) and is less than Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00).

Class Number Eight. — Shall be composed of all counties in which the assessed valuation is less than Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00).

The assessed value of each county shall be determined by the amounts certified to the State Tax Commission by the clerk of the board of supervisors, the assessed value of all public service corporations as certified by the State Tax Commission, and, in counties where oil or gas is produced, the actual value of such oil at the point of production as certified to the counties by the State Tax Commission under the provisions of Sections 27-25-501 through 27-25-525, and the actual value of such gas at the point of production as certified by the State Tax Commission under the provisions of Sections 27-25-701 through 27-25-723; provided, however, that the actual value of oil or gas at the point of production in counties where oil or gas is produced shall not be included in the assessed value of such county in determining the classification of such county in the fixing of fees to tax collectors under Section 25-7-21.

In any year the assessed value of a county shows that its class has changed to a higher class, such county shall remain in its original class until the succeeding January first and then be classed according to such assessed value.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to lower the classification of any county from its classification under the assessment of 1930.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6498; 1942, § 4159; Laws, 1922, ch. 163; Laws, 1928, ch. 89; Laws, 1930, ch. 83; Laws, 1944, ch. 192; Laws, 1950, ch. 280, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1960, ch. 199; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 11, eff October 1, 1997.

§ 25-3-2.
Elected county official’s salary reductions due to valuation and population changes.

No county elected official’s annual salary established under this chapter shall be reduced during his term of office as a result of a reduction in total assessed valuation or a change in population.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 567, § 4, eff from and after October 1, 1998.

§ 25-3-3.
Salaries of assessors also serving as tax collectors; additional compensation.

[Effective from and after January 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

The term “total assessed valuation” as used in this section only refers to the ad valorem assessment for the county and, in addition, in counties where oil or gas is produced, the actual value of oil at the point of production, as certified to the counties by the Department of Revenue under the provisions of Sections 27-25-501 through 27-25-525, and the actual value of gas as certified by the Department of Revenue under the provisions of Sections 27-25-701 through 27-25-723.

The salary of assessors and collectors of the various counties is fixed as full compensation for their services as county assessors or tax collectors, or both if the office of assessor has been combined with the office of tax collector. The annual salary of each assessor or tax collector, or both if the offices have been combined, shall be based upon the total assessed valuation of his respective county for the preceding taxable year in the following categories and for the following amounts:

For counties having a total assessed valuation of Three Billion Dollars ($3,000,000,000.00) or more, a salary of Seventy Thousand Five Hundred Sixty Dollars ($70,560.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00) but less than Three Billion Dollars ($3,000,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-seven Thousand Two Hundred Dollars ($67,200.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) but less than Two Billion Dollars ($2,000,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-four Thousand Five Hundred Seventy-five Dollars ($64,575.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00) but less than One Billion Dollars ($1,000,000,000.00), a salary of Sixty-one Thousand Four Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($61,425.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00) but less than Five Hundred Million Dollars ($500,000,000.00), a salary of Fifty-eight Thousand Eight Hundred Dollars ($58,800.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00) but less than Two Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($250,000,000.00), a salary of Fifty-six Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars ($56,700.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of at least Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00) but less than One Hundred Fifty Million Dollars ($150,000,000.00), a salary of Fifty-five Thousand One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars ($55,125.00);

For counties having a total assessed valuation of less than Seventy-five Million Dollars ($75,000,000.00), a salary of Fifty Thousand Nine Hundred Twenty-nine Dollars ($50,929.00).

In addition to all other compensation paid pursuant to this section, the board of supervisors shall pay to a person serving as both the tax assessor and tax collector in their county an additional Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) per year.

The annual salary established for assessors and tax collectors shall not be reduced as a result of a reduction in total assessed valuation. The salaries shall be increased as a result of an increase in total assessed valuation.

In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors and tax collectors in counties having two (2) judicial districts, the board of supervisors shall pay such assessors and tax collectors an additional Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00) per year. In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors or tax collectors, in counties maintaining two (2) full-time offices, the board of supervisors shall pay the assessor or tax collector an additional Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00) per year.

In addition to all other compensation paid to assessors and tax collectors, the board of supervisors of a county shall allow for such assessor or tax collector, or both, to be paid additional compensation when there is a contract between the county and one or more municipalities providing that the assessor or tax collector, or both, shall assess or collect taxes, or both, for the municipality or municipalities; and such assessor or tax collector, or both, shall be authorized to receive such additional compensation from the county and/or the municipality or municipalities in any amount allowed by the county and/or the municipality or municipalities for performing those services.

When any tax assessor holds a valid certificate of educational recognition from the International Association of Assessing Officers or is a licensed appraiser under Section 73-34-1 et seq., he shall receive an additional One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion. When any tax assessor is a licensed state certified Residential Appraiser (RA) or licensed state certified Timberland Appraiser (TA) under Section 73-34-1 et seq., or when any tax assessor holds a valid designation from the International Association of Assessing Officers as a Cadastral Mapping Specialist (CMS) or Personal Property Specialist (PPS) or Residential Evaluation Specialist (RES), he shall receive an additional Six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($6,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion. When any tax assessor holds the valid designation of Certified Assessment Evaluator (CAE) from the International Association of Assessing Officers or is a state certified General Real Estate Appraiser (GA) under Section 73-34-1 et seq., he shall receive an additional Eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($8,500.00) annually beginning the next fiscal year after completion.

The salaries provided for in this section shall be the total funds paid to the county assessors and tax collectors and shall be full compensation for their services, with any fees being paid to the county general fund.

The salaries provided for in this section shall be payable monthly on the first day of each calendar month by chancery clerk’s warrant drawn on the general fund of the county; however, the board of supervisors, by resolution duly adopted and entered on its minutes, may provide that such salaries shall be paid semimonthly on the first and fifteenth day of each month. If a pay date falls on a weekend or legal holiday, salary payments shall be made on the workday immediately preceding the weekend or legal holiday.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4160-01; Laws, 1968, ch. 369, § 7; Laws, 1970, ch 401, §§ 1 and 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 349; Laws, 1977, ch. 443; Laws, 1980, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 433, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 382, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 550, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 1, eff October 1, 2004ch. 505, Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 1, eff October 1, 2004, eff from and after October 1, 2004; Laws, 2019, ch. 485, § 3, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 25-3-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 14, eff from and after August 19, 2004 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the repeal of this section.)

[Codes, 1942 § 4160-02; Laws, 1968, ch. 369, § 12; Laws, 1974, ch. 368; Laws, 1977, ch. 469; Laws, 1980, ch. 497, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 526, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 513, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 433, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 335, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 314, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 382, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 550, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 2, eff October 1, 1997; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 14, eff from and after August 19, 2004 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the repeal of this section.)]

§ 25-3-7.
State contribution to compensation of assessors.

From the state treasury shall be paid up to one fourth (1/4) of the salary of each county assessor, but in no instance shall the payment exceed the figure paid for the fiscal year of 1970-1971 to the assessor, whether or not the offices of assessor and tax collector are combined.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 463; 1892, § 2017; 1906, § 2193; 1930, § 6501; 1942, § 4163; Laws, 1882, p 82; 1884, p 17; 1898 p 47; Laws, 1910, ch. 193; Laws, 1930, ch. 170; Laws, 1932, ch. 193; Laws, 1968, ch. 369, § 18, eff from and after the first Monday in January, 1972.

§ 25-3-9.
Salaries of county prosecuting attorneys.

Except as provided in subsections (2), (3) and (4) of this section, the county prosecuting attorney may receive for his services an annual salary to be paid by the board of supervisors as follows:

For counties with a total population of more than two hundred thousand (200,000), a salary not to exceed Twenty-eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($28,500.00).

For counties with a total population of more than one hundred thousand (100,000) and not more than two hundred thousand (200,000), a salary not to exceed Twenty-six Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($26,500.00).

For counties with a total population of more than fifty thousand (50,000) and not more than one hundred thousand (100,000), a salary not to exceed Twenty-one Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars ($21,700.00).

For counties with a total population of more than thirty-five thousand (35,000) and not more than fifty thousand (50,000), a salary not to exceed Twenty Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($20,400.00).

For counties with a total population of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) and not more than thirty-five thousand (35,000), a salary not to exceed Nineteen Thousand Three Hundred Dollars ($19,300.00).

For counties with a total population of more than fifteen thousand (15,000) and not more than twenty-five thousand (25,000), a salary not to exceed Seventeen Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars ($17,700.00).

For counties with a total population of more than ten thousand (10,000) and not more than fifteen thousand (15,000), a salary not to exceed Sixteen Thousand One Hundred Dollars ($16,100.00).

For counties with a total population of more than six thousand (6,000) and not more than ten thousand (10,000), a salary not to exceed Fourteen Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($14,500.00).

For counties with a total population of six thousand (6,000) or less, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may appoint a county prosecuting attorney, and it may pay such county prosecuting attorney an annual salary not to exceed Twelve Thousand Nine Hundred Dollars ($12,900.00).

In all cases of conviction there shall be taxed against the convicted defendant, as an item of cost, the sum of Three Dollars ($3.00), which shall be turned in to the county treasury as a part of the general county funds; however, the Three Dollars ($3.00) shall not be taxed in any case in which it is not the specific duty of the county attorney to appear and prosecute.

From and after October 1, 1993, in addition to the salaries provided for in this subsection, the board of supervisors of any county, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an additional amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the maximum allowable salary prescribed herein.

In the following counties, the county prosecuting attorney shall receive for his services an annual salary to be paid by the board of supervisors, as follows:

In any county bordering upon the Mississippi River and having a population of not less than thirty thousand (30,000) and not more than thirty-five thousand five hundred (35,500) according to the federal census of 1990, and in counties having a population of not more than thirty-seven thousand (37,000) according to the federal census of 1990 in which Interstate Highway 55 and U.S. Highway 98 intersect, the county prosecuting attorney shall receive a salary equal to the justice court judge of such county; and in any county wherein is located the state’s oldest state-supported institution of higher learning and wherein Mississippi State Highways 7 and 6 intersect, the county prosecuting attorney shall receive an annual salary equal to that of a member of the board of supervisors of such county.

In counties having a population in excess of fifty thousand (50,000) in the 1960 federal census, wherein is located a state-supported university and in which U.S. Highways 49 and 11 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Seventeen Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($17,400.00) per year. The Board of Supervisors of Forrest County, Mississippi, may, in its discretion, and by agreement with the county prosecuting attorney, employ the county prosecuting attorney as a full-time elected official during his/her term of office, designate additional duties and responsibilities of the office and pay additional compensation up to, but not in excess of, ninety percent (90%) of the annual compensation and salary of the county court judge and the youth court judge of Forrest County as authorized by law and provide a reasonable office and reasonable office expenses to the county prosecuting attorney. The salary authorized by this paragraph (b) for the county prosecuting attorney shall be the sole and complete salary for such prosecuting attorney in each county to which this paragraph applies, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.

In any county wherein is housed the seat of state government, wherein U.S. Highways 80 and 49 intersect, and having two (2) judicial districts, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of members of the board of supervisors in the county.

In any county which has two (2) judicial districts and wherein Highway 8 and Highway 15 intersect, having a population of greater than seventeen thousand (17,000), according to the 1980 federal decennial census, the board of supervisors shall pay the county prosecuting attorney a salary equal to that of a member of the board of supervisors of such county; provided that if such county prosecuting attorney is paid a sum for the purpose of defraying office or secretarial expenses, then the salary prescribed herein shall be reduced by that amount.

In any county bordering the State of Tennessee and in which Mississippi Highways No. 4 and 15 intersect, and having a population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) in the 1970 federal census, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be no less than Six Thousand Dollars ($6,000.00).

In any county having a population of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) and in which U.S. Highways 72 and 45 intersect, the salary of the county attorney shall be not less than Eight Thousand Dollars ($8,000.00).

In addition, such county prosecuting attorney shall receive the sum of One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00) per month for the purpose of defraying secretarial expense.

In any county wherein I-20 and State Highway 15 intersect; and in any county wherein I-20 and State Highway 35 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Eight Thousand Four Hundred Dollars ($8,400.00).

In any Class 1 county bordering on the Mississippi River, lying in whole or in part within a levee district, wherein U.S. Highways 82 and 61 intersect, bounded by the Sunflower River and Stales Bayou, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay an annual salary equal to the annual salary of members of the board of supervisors in the county. In addition, such county prosecuting attorney shall receive the sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month for the purpose of defraying secretarial expenses.

In any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico having two (2) judicial districts, and wherein U.S. Highways 90 and 49 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Nineteen Thousand Dollars ($19,000.00) per year. The Board of Supervisors of Harrison County, Mississippi, may, in its discretion, and by agreement with the county prosecuting attorney, employ the county prosecuting attorney and his/her assistant during his/her term of office, and designate additional duties and responsibilities of the office and pay additional compensation up to, but not in excess of, ninety percent (90%) of the annual compensation and salary of the county court judges of Harrison County as authorized by law and provide adequate office space and reasonable office expenses to the county prosecuting attorney and his/her assistant. The salary authorized by this paragraph (i) for the county prosecuting attorney and his/her assistant shall be the sole and complete salary paid by the county for such prosecuting attorney and his/her assistant in each county to which this paragraph applies, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary.

In any county bordering on the State of Alabama, having a population in excess of seventy-five thousand (75,000) according to the 1980 decennial census in which is located an institution of higher learning and a United States military installation and which is traversed by an interstate highway, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall not be less than Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) nor more than the amount of the annual salary received by a member of the board of supervisors of that county.

In any county with a land area wherein Mississippi Highways 8 and 9 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Eight Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($8,500.00) per year.

In any Class 2 county wherein Mississippi Highways 6 and 3 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) per year nor more than the amount of the annual salary received by a member of the board of supervisors of that county.

In any county wherein Interstate Highway 55 and State Highway 8 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Twelve Thousand Dollars ($12,000.00) per year.

In any county wherein U.S. Highway 51 intersects Mississippi Highway 6, and having two (2) judicial districts, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Three Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($3,600.00) per year.

In any county bordering on the Alabama state line, having a population of greater than fifteen thousand (15,000) according to the 1970 federal decennial census, wherein U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 18 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Three Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($3,600.00) nor greater than that of a member of the board of supervisors of such county. All prior acts, orders and resolutions of the board of supervisors of such county which authorized the payment of the salary in conformity with the provisions of this paragraph, whether or not heretofore specifically authorized by law are hereby ratified, approved and confirmed.

In any county wherein is located a state-supported institution of higher learning and wherein U.S. Highway 82 and Mississippi Highway 389 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of members of the board of supervisors in the county.

In any county having two (2) judicial districts wherein Mississippi Highway 32 intersects U.S. Highway 49E, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than Twelve Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars ($12,700.00).

In any county traversed by the Natchez Trace Parkway wherein U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 4 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of justice court judges in the county.

In any county having a population of more than fourteen thousand (14,000) according to the 1970 census and which county is bordered on the north by the State of Tennessee and on the east by the State of Alabama and in which U.S. Highway No. 72 and Highway No. 25 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of justice court judges in the county.

(i) The Board of Supervisors of Madison County, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary in the amount of Twenty-eight Thousand Dollars ($28,000.00), if the county prosecuting attorney is not employed on a full-time basis.

From and after October 1, 1993, in addition to the salary provided for in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an additional amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the maximum allowable salary prescribed herein.

The Board of Supervisors of Madison County, in its discretion, may employ the elected county prosecuting attorney on a full-time basis during his or her term of office and may pay compensation to the full-time prosecuting attorney in an amount of not more than ninety percent (90%) of the annual compensation and salary of the county court judges of the county as authorized by law, and may provide adequate office space and reasonable office expenses to the county prosecuting attorney. The salary authorized by this subparagraph (iii) for the county prosecuting attorney shall be the sole and complete salary paid by the county for the prosecuting attorney in Madison County, notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary.

In any county having a population in the 1970 census in excess of thirty-five thousand (35,000) and in which U.S. Highways 49W and 82 intersect, and in which is located a state penitentiary, the annual salary of a county prosecuting attorney shall be Thirty Thousand Four Hundred Twenty Dollars ($30,420.00).

In any county wherein Mississippi Highway 50 intersects U.S. Highway 45-Alternate, and having a population greater than twenty thousand (20,000) according to the 1980 federal decennial census, a salary equal to that of a member of the board of supervisors of such county; provided that if such county prosecuting attorney is paid a sum for the purpose of defraying office or secretarial expenses, then the salary prescribed herein shall be reduced by that amount.

In any county in which the 1975 assessed valuation was Forty Million Seven Hundred Thirty-nine Thousand Four Hundred Sixty-six Dollars ($40,739,466.00) and wherein U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 8 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be equal to that of a member of the board of supervisors of such county.

In any county bordering on the Mississippi River having a population greater than fifty thousand (50,000) according to the 1980 federal decennial census and also having a national military park and national cemetery, an annual salary of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or a salary equal to that of a member of the board of supervisors in such county, whichever is greater. In addition, such county prosecuting attorney shall receive the sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month for the purpose of defraying secretarial expenses.

In any county bordering on the Alabama state line, traversed by the Chickasawhay River, and wherein U.S. Highway 45 and U.S. Highway 84 intersect, a salary that shall be equal to the annual salary of a member of the board of supervisors of such county. All prior acts, orders and resolutions of the board of supervisors of such county which authorize the payment of the salary of the county prosecuting attorney in conformity with the provisions of this section as it existed immediately prior to April 12, 1985, are hereby ratified, approved, confirmed and validated.

In any county having a population greater than sixty-five thousand five hundred eighty (65,580) but less than sixty-five thousand five hundred ninety (65,590) according to the 1990 federal decennial census, wherein U.S. Highway 45 intersects with Mississippi Highway 6, an annual salary equal to Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00).

In any county where an institution of higher learning is located and wherein U.S. Highway 82 and U.S. Highway 45 intersect, the salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be not less than that of a member of the board of supervisors in such county, and the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay such county prosecuting attorney a salary in an amount not to exceed the amount of the salary of the District Attorney for the Sixteenth Judicial District of Mississippi.

In any county having a population greater than six thousand (6,000) according to the federal decennial census and wherein U.S. Highway 61 and Highway 24 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of members of the board of supervisors in the county.

In any county having a population greater than thirty-one thousand (31,000) according to the 1990 federal decennial census and wherein U.S. Highway 61 and U.S. Highway 49 intersect, a salary of not less than the annual salary of justice court judges in the county.

(i) The Rankin County prosecuting attorney, if such person is not employed on a full-time basis, shall receive an annual salary of Twenty-nine Thousand Dollars ($29,000.00).

The Board of Supervisors of Rankin County, in its discretion, may employ the elected county prosecuting attorney and an assistant on a full-time basis during his or her term of office and may pay compensation to such full-time prosecuting attorney in an amount of not more than ninety percent (90%) of the annual compensation and salary of the county court judges of the county as authorized by law, and may provide adequate office space and reasonable office expenses to the county prosecuting attorney and his/her assistant. The Board of Supervisors of Rankin County, in its discretion, may also employ a full-time assistant county prosecuting attorney and may pay such person an annual salary in such amount as determined by the board of supervisors. The salary authorized by this paragraph (dd)(ii) for the elected county prosecuting attorney and an assistant shall be the sole and complete salary paid by the county for the elected prosecuting attorney and assistant in Rankin County, notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary.

In any county having a population greater than eight thousand (8,000) but less than eight thousand two hundred (8,200) according to the 1990 federal census, and in which U.S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 4 intersect, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the county prosecuting attorney an amount not to exceed Fourteen Thousand Dollars ($14,000.00), in addition to the maximum allowable salary for that attorney under subsection (1), beginning on April 1, 1997.

In any county having a population greater than thirty thousand three hundred (30,300) but less than thirty thousand four hundred (30,400) according to the 1990 federal census, and in which U.S. Highway 78 and Mississippi Highway 7 intersect, a salary of not less than the annual salary of a member of the board of supervisors in such county.

In any county having a population greater than thirteen thousand three hundred (13,300) but less than thirteen thousand four hundred (13,400) according to the 1990 federal census, and in which Mississippi Highway 24 and Mississippi Highway 48 intersect, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the county prosecuting attorney an additional amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the maximum allowable salary for that attorney under subsection (1).

In any county having a population greater than eight thousand three hundred (8,300) but less than eight thousand four hundred (8,400) according to the 1990 federal census, and in which U.S. Highway 84 and U.S. Highway 98 intersect, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the county prosecuting attorney an additional amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the maximum allowable salary for that attorney under subsection (1).

In any county having a population of more than thirty thousand four hundred (30,400) and which is traversed in whole or in part by I-59, U.S. Highways 98 and 11 and State Highway 13, the annual salary of the county prosecuting attorney shall be Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00).

In any county having a population greater than twenty thousand (20,000) according to the 1990 federal census and wherein U.S. Highway 78 and Mississippi Highway 25 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of justice court judges in the county.

In any county having a population greater than twelve thousand four hundred (12,400) but less than twelve thousand five hundred (12,500) according to the 1990 federal census, and in which U.S. Highway 84 and Mississippi Highway 27 intersect, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the county prosecuting attorney an additional amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the maximum allowable salary for that attorney under subsection (1).

In any county having a population greater than thirty thousand two hundred (30,200) but less than thirty thousand three hundred (30,300) according to the 1990 federal census, and in which U.S. Interstate 55 and Mississippi Highway 84 intersect, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the county prosecuting attorney an additional amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of the maximum allowable salary for that attorney under subsection (1).

In any county on the Mississippi River levee, having a population greater than forty-one thousand eight hundred (41,800) but less than forty-one thousand nine hundred (41,900) according to the 1990 federal census wherein U.S. Highway 61 and Mississippi Highway 8 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of members of the board of supervisors in the county. In addition, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney the sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month for the purpose of defraying secretarial expenses.

In any county having a population greater than twenty-four thousand seven hundred (24,700) and less than twenty-four thousand nine hundred (24,900) according to the 1990 federal census, wherein Mississippi Highways 15 and 16 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of members of the board of supervisors in the county.

In any county having a population greater than thirty-seven thousand (37,000) but less than thirty-eight thousand (38,000) according to the 1990 federal census, in which is located a state supported institution of higher learning, and in which U.S. Highway 82 and Mississippi Highway 7 intersect, the board of supervisors may, in its discretion, pay the county prosecuting attorney a salary in an amount not to exceed the amount of the salary of the District Attorney for the Fourth Judicial District of Mississippi.

In any county in which U.S. Highway 78 and Mississippi Highway 15 intersect and which is traversed by the Tallahatchie River, a salary equal to that of members of the board of supervisors of the county, which salary shall be in addition to any sums received for the purpose of defraying office or secretarial expenses and sums received as youth court prosecutor fees.

In any county bordering on the State of Tennessee and the State of Arkansas, wherein Interstate Highway 55 and Mississippi Highway 302 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of justice court judges in the county.

In any county that is traversed by the Natchez Trace Parkway and in which Mississippi Highway 35 and Mississippi Highway 12 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary in the amount of the annual salary of justice court judges in the county.

In any county in which Mississippi Highway 14 and Mississippi Highway 25 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary in the amount of Twenty-two Thousand Dollars ($22,000.00).

In any county in which Interstate Highway 59 and U.S. Highway 84 intersect, the board of supervisors, in its discretion, may pay the county prosecuting attorney an annual salary equal to the annual salary of members of the board of supervisors in the county.

(i) In any county bordering on the Mississippi River having a population greater than fifty thousand (50,000) according to the 1980 federal decennial census and also having a national military park and national cemetery, the board of supervisors of the county shall pay an annual salary of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) or a salary equal to that of a member of the board of supervisors, whichever is greater, if not employed on a full-time basis. In addition, the county prosecuting attorney shall be paid the sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per month for the purpose of defraying secretarial expenses, if not employed on a full-time basis; or

The board of supervisors of the county described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, in its discretion, may employ the elected county prosecuting attorney on a full-time basis during his or her term of office and may pay compensation to the full-time prosecuting attorney in an amount of not more than ninety percent (90%) of the annual compensation and salary of the County Court Judge of Warren County as authorized by law, and may provide adequate office space and reasonable office expenses to the county prosecuting attorney. The salary authorized herein by this subparagraph (ii) for the county prosecuting attorney shall be the sole and complete salary paid by the county for the prosecuting attorney in Warren County, notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary.

In any case where a salary, expense allowance or other sum is authorized or paid by the board of supervisors pursuant to this section, that salary, expense allowance or other sum shall not be reduced or terminated during the term for which the county attorney was elected.

Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, no county prosecuting attorney shall receive for his services an annual salary less than the salary paid to a justice court judge in his respective county.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 699; 1930, § 6502; 1942, § 4164; Laws, 1916, ch. 238; Laws, 1926, ch. 154; Laws, 1928, ch. 203; Laws, 1932, ch. 193; Laws, 1948, ch. 262; Laws, 1956, ch. 190; Laws, 1966, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 1974, ch. 550, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 467; Laws, 1980, ch. 513; Laws, 1981, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 506; Laws, 1990, ch. 587, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 554, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 550, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 570, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 547, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 505, § 13; Laws, 2007, ch. 557, § 4; Laws, 2008, ch. 396, § 1, eff August 11, 2008 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, to the amendment of this section).